Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.128

Fees—Library operations account.

(1) In addition to other required filing fees, the secretary of state shall collect a fee of five dollars at the time of filing for:

(a) Articles of incorporation for domestic corporations or applications for certificates of authority for foreign corporations under Title 23B RCW;

(b) Certificates of formation for domestic limited liability companies or registrations of foreign limited liability companies under chapter 25.15 RCW;

(c) Registrations of foreign and domestic partnerships and limited liability partnerships under chapter 25.05 RCW;

(d) Certificates of limited partnerships and registrations of foreign limited partnerships under chapter 25.10 RCW; and

(e) Registrations of trademarks under chapter 19.77 RCW.

(2) Moneys received under subsection (1) of this section must be deposited into the library operations account created in RCW 43.07.129.

[ 2019 c 448 s 6; 2007 c 523 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 448: See note following RCW 43.07.405.

Effective date—2007 c 523 s 1: "Section 1 of this act takes effect January 1, 2009." [ 2007 c 523 s 7.]

Contingency—2007 c 523: "If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2007, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void." [ 2007 c 523 s 6.] Funding was provided in 2007 c 520 s 6013(9) (capital budget).